Hawaii statutes.
§386-82 Claim for compensation; limitation
of time. The right to compensation under this chapter shall be barred
unless a written claim therefor is made to the director of labor and industrial
relations[:]

(1) Within two years after the date at which the effects
of the injury for which the employee is entitled to compensation have become
manifest; and

(2) Within
five years after the date of the accident or occurrence which caused the
injury.

The foregoing limitations of time shall not
apply to a claim for injury caused by compressed air or due to occupational
exposure to, or contact with, arsenic, asbestos, benzol, beryllium, zirconium,
cadmium, chrome, lead, fluorine, or other mineral or substance with
carcinogenic properties, as incorporated in the Hawaii Occupational Safety and
Health Standards, or to exposure to X-rays, radium, ionizing radiation, or
radioactive substances, but such claim shall be barred unless it is made to the
director, in writing, within two years after knowledge that the injury was
proximately caused by, or resulted from the nature of, the employment. The
claim may be made by the injured employee or the employee's dependents or by
some other person on the employee's or their behalf. The claim shall state in
ordinary language the time, place, nature, and cause of the injury. [L 1963, c
116, pt of §1; Supp, §97-91; HRS §386-82; am L 1979, c 114, §1; gen ch 1985]

Revision
Note

In the first paragraph, (1) and (2) reformatted
as paragraphs (1) and (2), and in paragraph (1), punctuation changed pursuant
to §23G-15.

Case Notes

Statute of limitations for asserting claim starts from
discovery of injury or illness. 50 H. 1, 427 P.2d 845 (1967).

Condition which causes no loss of function and having no
treatment should not be considered an injury. 71 H. 269, 788 P.2d 170 (1990).

No lawful claim for workers’ compensation benefits were filed
with the director where employer’s filing of "WC-1" form did not
constitute a claim for workers’ compensation benefits on employee’s behalf and
no evidence that employer had been "duly empowered to act" on injured
employee’s behalf. 89 H. 411, 974 P.2d 51 (1999).

Under this section, the two-year statute of limitations for
the filing of a workers' compensation claim begins to run when the claimant, as
a reasonable person, should recognize the nature, seriousness, and probable
compensable character of claimant's injury or disease. 93 H. 8, 994 P.2d 1054
(2000).

In order to identify the "date of injury" required
by the department of labor and industrial relations in connection with the
filing of a workers' compensation claim under this section, a claimant in a
case arising under the "injury-by-disease" prong of §386-3 may rely
upon the last day of employment as the "date of disability", but this
"date of disability" may also be the date of diagnosis of the
disabling condition. 94 H. 70, 9 P.3d 382 (2000).

Tolling of limitation period. 2 H. App. 136, 627 P.2d 288
(1981).

The two-year limitation period begins at a point where the
employee's injury has had a disabling effect that prevents employee from
working. 2 H. App. 157, 628 P.2d 205 (1981).

Cited: 24 H. 97, 101 (1917); 24 H. 731, 738 (1919).

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next